Delaware, session 153, SB106.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Subchapter I, Chapter 41, Title 14 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 4124. Cell phone use policy by students during school hours. (a) Each school district and charter school shall adopt a policy, with educator input, about cell phone use by students during school hours that, at a minimum, must include all of the following: (1) Clear guidelines about what constitutes acceptable cell phone use at school. (2) A requirement that limits cell phone use during instructional time . (3) The designation of times and places during which students may use their cell phones at school. (4) Guidelines that encourage communication between the schools, parents or guardians, and students about the cell phone use policy. (5) A system of appropriate consequences for violations of the cell phone use policy. (6) Exceptions that address, and are applicable to, emergency situations and medical or educational accommodations. (b) Each school district and charter school shall provide its adopted cell phone policy to the Department. (c) By August 1, 2025, each school district and charter school shall post its adopted cell phone policy on its website. (d) Each school district and charter school shall implement and enforce its cell phone policy in a fair and consistent manner. Each school district and charter school is responsible for ensuring that implementation and enforcement is not solely the responsibility of classroom educators. (e) (1) Each school district and charter school may amend its adopted cell phone use policy as needed. (2) If a school district or charter school amends its cell phone use policy, it shall provide the amended policy to the Department within 90 days of the amendment. (3) The school district or charter school shall post the amended policy on its website.